Arkansas, session 2025, HB1431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-15-103(4), concerning the definition of
"domestic abuse" under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) “Domestic abuse” means:
(A) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the
infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault
between family or household members; or
(B) Any sexual conduct between family or household
members, whether minors or adults, that constitutes a crime under the laws of
this state; or
(C) A pattern of behavior as defined by "course of
*LJH133*
02/05/2025 11:53:49 AM LJH133

HB1431
control" or "disturbing the peace" under § 9-15-219;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-15-219(a)(2), concerning the definition
of "disturbing the peace" under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A) "Disturbing the peace" means a pattern of behavior that
unreasonably destroys the mental or emotional calm of a family or household
member based on the totality of the circumstances.
(B) "Disturbing the peace" includes without limitation
course of control.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-15-219(b), concerning the entry of an
order enjoining a party from engaging in course of control or disturbing the
peace under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A court may enter an ex parte order enjoining a party from
engaging in course of control or disturbing the peace, including without
limitation through one (1) or more of the following acts:



















02/05/2025 11:53:49 AM LJH133